incubator/apertium-en-lt.lt.dix
    <pardef n="ger/as__adj">
      <!-- Positive degree, masculine -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r>as<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>as<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>am</l>
          <r>as<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ą</l>
          <r>as<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>as<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ame</l>
          <r>as<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>as<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ų</l>
          <r>as<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iems</l>
          <r>as<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r>as<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ais</l>
          <r>as<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uose</l>
          <r>as<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>


      <!-- Positive degree, feminine -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>as<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os</l>
          <r>as<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ai</l>
          <r>as<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ą</l>
          <r>as<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>as<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oje</l>
          <r>as<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os</l>
          <r>as<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ų</l>
          <r>as<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oms</l>
          <r>as<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r>as<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>omis</l>
          <r>as<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ose</l>
          <r>as<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>

    <!-- Conjunctions -->

    <pardef n="ir__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Prepositions -->

    <pardef n="abipus__pr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
  </pardefs>

    <e lm="ir"><i>ir</i><par n="ir__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="bei"><i>bei</i><par n="ir__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="bet"><i>bet</i><par n="ir__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="o"><i>o</i><par n="ir__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="tačiau"><i>tačiau</i><par n="ir__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="kad"><i>kad</i><par n="ir__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="jog"><i>jog</i><par n="ir__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="kai"><i>kai</i><par n="ir__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="kol"><i>kol</i><par n="ir__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="jei"><i>jei</i><par n="ir__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="jeigu"><i>jeigu</i><par n="ir__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="nes"><i>nes</i><par n="ir__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="kadangi"><i>kadangi</i><par n="ir__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="kaip"><i>kaip</i><par n="ir__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="nors"><i>nors</i><par n="ir__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="ar"><i>ar</i><par n="ir__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="arba"><i>arba</i><par n="ir__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="abipus"><i>abipus</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="anapus"><i>anapus</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="anot"><i>anot</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ant"><i>ant</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="arti"><i>arti</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="arčiau"><i>arčiau</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="aukščiau"><i>aukščiau</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="be"><i>be</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="dėka"><i>dėka</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="dėl"><i>dėl</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="greta"><i>greta</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="iki"><i>iki</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="įkypai"><i>įkypai</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="įstrižai"><i>įstrižai</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="iš"><i>iš</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="išilgai"><i>išilgai</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="kiaurai"><i>kiaurai</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="kitapus"><i>kitapus</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="lig"><i>lig</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ligi"><i>ligi</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="link"><i>link</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="netoli"><i>netoli</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="nuo"><i>nuo</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="pasak"><i>pasak</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="pirma"><i>pirma</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="pirmiau"><i>pirmiau</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="po"><i>po</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="prie"><i>prie</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="pusiau"><i>pusiau</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="skersai"><i>skersai</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="skradžiai"><i>skradžiai</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="šalia"><i>šalia</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="šiapus"><i>šiapus</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="tarp"><i>tarp</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="už"><i>už</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="viduj"><i>viduj</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="vidury"><i>vidury</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="vietoj"><i>vietoj</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="virš"><i>virš</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="viršuj"><i>viršuj</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="viršum"><i>viršum</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="žemiau"><i>žemiau</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="apie"><i>apie</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="aplink"><i>aplink</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="į"><i>į</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="įkypai"><i>įkypai</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="įstrižai"><i>įstrižai</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="išilgai"><i>išilgai</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="kiaurai"><i>kiaurai</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="pagal"><i>pagal</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="palei"><i>palei</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="pas"><i>pas</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="paskui"><i>paskui</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="per"><i>per</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="po"><i>po</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="prieš"><i>prieš</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="priešais"><i>priešais</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="pro"><i>pro</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="skradžiai"><i>skradžiai</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="skersai"><i>skersai</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="už"><i>už</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="po"><i>po</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="su"><i>su</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="sulig"><i>sulig</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ties"><i>ties</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="geras"><i>ger</i><par n="ger/as__adj"/></e>
